Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-844
Teachers and school nurses; contract; minimum standard.

Sections 79-843 and 79-844 provide a minimum standard and do not repeal any law of a governing authority that provides for additional contract rights pertaining to the same subject matter.

Laws 1973, LB 422, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1254.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 474.

Former section 79-1254.02 is not applicable to a Class V school district. Kibbon v. School Dist. of Omaha, 196 Neb. 293, 242 N.W.2d 634 (1976).